Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2949
Premises registration; animal disease traceability; information; restrictions on disclosure; violations; penalty.

(1) Any information that a person provides to the department for purposes of premises registration or for voluntary participation in or compliance with animal disease traceability shall not be a public record subject to disclosure under sections 84-712 to 84-712.09. The department and its employees or agents shall not disclose such information to any other person or agency, except when such disclosure:

(a) Is authorized by the person who provided the information; or

(b) Is necessary for purposes of disease surveillance or to carry out epidemiological investigations related to incidences of animal disease.

(2) The department may disclose information as authorized by this section subject to any confidentiality requirements that the department determines are appropriate under the circumstances.

(3) Any person who violates this section shall be subject to prosecution for official misconduct pursuant to section 28-924.

(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the department from discussing, reporting, or otherwise disclosing the progress or results of disease surveillance activities or epidemiological investigations related to incidence of animal disease.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 49.